Maine, session 132, LD1890.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §329, sub-§4-A, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 424, Pt. A, §5
and affected by Pt. E, §1, is amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) If it requires a capital expenditure of more than $3,000,000 $7,500,000.
Beginning January 1, 2027 and annually thereafter, the threshold amount for
review must be updated by the commissioner to reflect the change in the United
States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index
medical care services index, with an effective date of January 1st each year; or
Page 1 - 132LR2124(04)